createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_o.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nagamoyaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: nagamoyan 
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: nagamoyaang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: nagamoyang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: nagamoyeg
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: nagamod
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: nagamowaad
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: nagamonid
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: nagamonid
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: nagamong
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: nagamosiwaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: nagamosiwan 
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: nagamosiwaang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: nagamosiwang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: nagamosiweg
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: nagamosig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: nagamosigwaa
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: nagamosinig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: nagamosinig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: nagamosing
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nagamoyaambaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: nagamoyamban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: nagamoyaangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: nagamoyangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: nagamoyegiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: nagamopan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: nagamowaapan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: nagamonipan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: nagamonipan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: nagamongiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nagamosiwaambaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: nagamosiwamban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: nagamosiwaangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: nagamosiwangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: nagamosiwegiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: nagamosigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: nagamosigwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: nagamosinigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: nagamosinigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: nagamosingiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nagamowaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: nagamowanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: nagamowaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: nagamowangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: nagamowegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: nagamogwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: nagamowaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: nagamowiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nagamosiiwaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: nagamosiiwanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: nagamosiiwaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: nagamosiiwangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: nagamosiiwegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: nagamosiigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: nagamosiiwaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: nagamosiiwiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Sg: nagamowaambaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg: nagamowambanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Excl: nagamowaangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Incl: nagamowangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl: nagamowegibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: nagamogobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: nagamowaagobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: nagamonigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: nagamonigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X: nagamowiingibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Sg: nagamosiiwaambaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg: nagamosiiwambanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Excl: nagamosiiwaangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Incl: nagamosiiwangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Pl: nagamosiiwegibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: nagamosiigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: nagamosiiwaagobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: nagamosiinigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: nagamosiinigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X: nagamosiiwiingibanen
